Washington statutes.
RCW 35.48.040

Refund to revolving fund.

If there are funds in any local improvement district fund or condemnation award fund sufficient to pay or retire any bond or warrant issued and payable from said fund, and the city or town is the owner and holder of the bond or warrant next payable from the fund, the city or town treasurer shall from the moneys in the local improvement or condemnation award fund place in the revolving fund a sum of money equivalent to the amount paid by the city or town for such bond or warrant and shall thereupon cancel, mark paid and remove from said revolving fund such bond or warrant.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.48.040. Prior: 1943 c 244 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9351-14.]